Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-499.01
Revocation; reinstatement fee.

Whenever an operator's license is revoked under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the licensee shall pay a reinstatement fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles to reinstate his or her eligibility for a license in addition to complying with the other provisions of the act. The reinstatement fee shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars. The department shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit seventy-five dollars of each fee to the General Fund and fifty dollars of each fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 11.